Utah statutes.
32B-13-302.   Notifying the department of a change of ownership.

The commission may suspend or revoke a beer wholesaling license if a beer wholesaler licensee does not immediately notify the department of change in:

(1)  ownership of the beer wholesaler licensee;

(2)  for a corporate owner, the:

(a)  corporate officers or directors; or

(b)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the corporation; or

(3)  for a limited liability company:

(a)  managers; or

(b)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.

